Hawaii statutes.
§431:10A-102.5 Limited
benefit health insurance. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b)
or elsewhere in this article, when used in this article, the terms
"accident insurance", "health insurance", or "sickness
insurance" shall not include an accident-only, specified disease, hospital
indemnity, long-term care, disability, dental, vision, medicare supplement, or
other limited benefit health insurance contract that pays benefits directly to
the insured or the insured's assigns and in which the amount of the benefit
paid is not based upon the actual costs incurred by the insured.

(b) When used in
sections 431:10A-104, 431:10A-105, 431:10A-106, 431:10A-107, 431:10A-108,
431:10A-109, 431:10A-110, 431:10A-111, 431:10A-112, 431:10A-113, 431:10A-114,
431:10A-117, 431:10A-118, 431:10A-601, 431:10A-602, 431:10A-603, and 431:10A‑604,
except as otherwise provided, the terms "accident insurance",
"accident and health or sickness insurance", "health
insurance", or "sickness insurance" shall include an
accident-only, specified disease, hospital indemnity, long-term care,
disability, dental, vision, medicare supplement, or other limited benefit
health insurance contract regardless of the manner in which benefits are paid;
provided that if any of the requirements set forth in the foregoing sections as
applied to long-term care insurance conflict with the provisions of article
10H, the provisions of article 10H shall govern and control. [L 2010, c
115, §1; am L 2011, c 12, §1; am L 2014, c 186, §7]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next